Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,128
Reasonable attorney's fees; court order.

The court may order payment of reasonable attorney fees and court costs to a successful plaintiff in a suit brought pursuant to section 49-14,127. If the court finds that an action was brought without reasonable cause, the court may order the plaintiff to pay reasonable attorney fees and court costs incurred by the defendant.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 128.